District of Columbia statutes.
47-2733

Repealed

Clean Air Act compliance fee.

Repealed.

Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-242, § 4, 42 DCR 86
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 781, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11702(a)(1)
Pub. L. 105-33, title XI, § 11721, Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 786, provided: “Sec. 11721. Effective Date. Except as otherwise provided in this title, the provisions of this title shall take effect on the later of October 1, 1997, or the day the District of Columbia Financial Responsibility and Management Assistance Authority certifies that the financial plan and budget for the District government for fiscal year 1998 meet the requirements of section 201(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Financial Responsibility and Management Assistance Act of 1995, as amended by this title.”
1981 Ed., § 47-2733.